Terms of Use
T&C
FAQ's
Referral T&C
Campaign T&C
Fair Usage Policy
New User Offer
Recharge
Pay By magicpin
Payments T&C
magicPro
TERMS OF USE
Agreement Between You and Samast Technologies Private Limited
Thank you for visiting www.magicpin.in or the magicpin mobile application (together the “
magicpin
” ).
magicpin is owned and operated by Samast Technologies Private Limited, a company incorporated under the
        provisions
        of the Companies Act, 2013 with its registered office at Plot No.379 & 380, Sector - 29, Near IFFCO Chowk Metro
        Station, Gurugram, Haryana 122001. These Terms of Use govern you, the User of magicpin, and your conduct,
        regardless
        of the means of access. You represent and warrant you possess the capacity and legal right to enter into this
        Agreement and to use this Website in accordance with the terms and conditions herein. You also acknowledge and
        agree
        that, unless we specifically provide otherwise, this Agreement only applies to this site and our online
        activities
        and does not apply to any of our offline activities.
        By using the various services available on the magicpin Platform (“Services”), you consent to these terms,
        magicpin’s Privacy Policy, and any community guidelines and supplemental terms provided to you for the Services
        that
        you use (collectively, “Terms”) and magicpin’s efforts to improve every User’s experience on the platform.
        Please
        read the Terms carefully, as they form the entire agreement between you and magicpin.
Usage of Services
Posting content on the Platform:
you shall be required to log on using your registered mobile number/
                            username/email address/Facebook account and password
you may upload/post: (i) content that either was created by you entirely or
                            legally belongs to you, or you have a legally valid license which permits you to upload/post
                            the
                            content; or (ii) your reviews, comments, reactions, etc., to specific content on the
                            Platform
                            (the content/information covered under (i) and (ii) above, the “Content”), and if in the
                            event
                            we suffer any loss or damages on account of the Content you have uploaded/posted belonging
                            to
                            another party or such Content violating or infringing the rights of any party, you shall be
                            liable to indemnify us for such loss and damages;
by uploading/posting any Content, and in consideration of you using the
                            Services, you automatically constitute you granting a royalty-free, perpetual, irrevocable,
                            transferrable, worldwide license to magicpin to (a) use, reproduce, modify, adapt, publish,
                            translate, create derivative works from, distribute, perform, transmit and display such
                            Content
                            (in whole or part) and/or to incorporate it in other works in any form, media, mode of
                            delivery
                            or technology now known or later developed, (b) display online or offline your Content (or
                            part
                            thereof, or any modification, adaptation, translation or derivative works thereof) online
                            and
                            offline and permit others (including without limitation magicpin’s co-brand partners) to do
                            the
                            same, and (c) permit other users to access, reproduce, distribute, publicly display, prepare
                            derivative works of, and publicly perform your content via the Services, as may be permitted
                            by
                            the functionality of those Services (e.g., for users to re-blog, re-post or download your
                            content). Further, the license you have granted to us as aforesaid shall not lapse
                            notwithstanding that we have not used, distributed, displayed, published, or
                            adapted/modified
                            any of the Content for any duration.
You shall, under no circumstances, upload any Content that:
belongs to another person and to which you do not have any right;
is grossly harmful, harassing, blasphemous, defamatory, obscene, pornographic,
                                    paedophilic, libellous, invasive of another’s privacy, hateful, or racially,
                                    ethnically
                                    objectionable, disparaging, relating or encouraging money laundering or gambling, or
                                    otherwise unlawful in any manner;
harm minors in any way;
infringes any patent, trademark, copyright or other proprietary rights;
violates any law for the time being in force;
deceives or misleads the reader/viewer about the origin of any
                                    information, or contains any information that is grossly offensive or menacing in
                                    nature;
impersonate another person;
contain software viruses or any other computer code, files or
                                    programmes
                                    that is designed to interrupt, destroy or limit the functionality of any computer
                                    resource;
threatens the unity, integrity, defence security or sovereignty of
                                    India, friendly relations with foreign states or public order or causes incitement
                                    to
                                    the commission of any cognizable offence or prevents investigation of any offence or
                                    is
                                    insulting any other nation.
While magicpin does not make any editorial determination about the Content
                            to be
                            displayed and made accessible on the Platform, if: (i) we receive any notice or
                            communication
                            that any Content or any part of the Content belongs to a party who has not consented to such
                            content being uploaded and accessible on the Platform or that it is violative of the rights
                            of
                            any person who has not consented to such Content being uploaded and accessible on the
                            Platform;
                            or (ii) it comes to our attention that any of the Content violates these Terms, we shall be
                            entitled to remove such content/block public access to such content either temporarily or
                            permanently, subject to the provisions of the Indian Copyright Act, 1957, and the
                            Information
                            Technology Act, 2000, and as we deem fit or in compliance with the orders or directions of
                            the
                            court (if applicable) and we shall have the right, at our discretion, to remove your
                            account,
                            and in either case you shall have no right to make any claims against us for removing or
                            blocking such Content;
you understand that we act as a technological platform providing incidental,
                            transient storage of the content uploaded by you for the purpose of electronic transmission
                            to
                            and access by members of the general public as understood under the Indian Copyright Act,
                            1957
                            and as an intermediary as understood under the Indian Information Technology Act, 2000.
you shall be solely responsible for safeguarding your login details
                            including
                            username and password and that we shall have no liability whatsoever.
Authority. You agree that you are permitted to use the Services under applicable
                    law. If
                    you are accessing an account(s) on behalf of the account owner (e.g., as an administrator,
                    consultant,
                    analyst, etc.), the Terms apply to your activities on behalf of the account owner.
Age. If you are under the age of majority as per the laws of your country of
                    residence
                    (
“Minimum Age”
) you may not register for an account. magicpin does not include any age
                    inappropriate. User data is processed by magicpin, through verification and other internal checks,
                    in a
                    manner that both protects any user information as well as advances the best interests of children.
                    Parents/adult guardians are required to monitor/regulate the content being viewed by their wards who
                    have not attained the Minimum Age. Parental control tools available from third party vendors/service
                    providers might be useful in this regard. It shall also be responsibility of parents/adult guardians
                    to
                    ensure that their wards do not view Content that is not appropriate for them.
Member Conduct. You agree not to use the Services to:
obtain or attempt to obtain unauthorized access to the Services or
                            to
                            magicpin’s servers, systems, network, or data;
make available any Content that is harmful to children, threatening,
                            abusive, harassing, tortious, defamatory, vulgar, obscene, libelous, invasive of
                            another's privacy, hateful, or racially, ethnically, or otherwise objectionable;
violate any applicable laws or regulations;
impersonate any person or entity; or forge or manipulate headers or
                            identifiers to disguise the origin of any content transmitted through the Service;
make available any Content that you do not have the right to make
                            available or that infringes any patent, trademark, trade secret, copyright or other
                            proprietary rights of any person or entity;
post Content containing advertisements or other commercial
                            solicitations
                            without our prior written permission;
make available viruses or any other computer code, files, programs
                            or
                            Content designed to interrupt, destroy or limit the functionality of the Services or
                            affect other users; or
interfere with or disrupt the Services or servers, systems or
                            networks
                            connected to the Services in any way.
Use of Services. You must follow any guidelines or policies associated with
                    the
                    use of the Services. You must not misuse or interfere with the Services or try to access
                    them
                    using a method other than the interface and the instructions that we provide. You may use
                    the
                    Services only as permitted by law. Unless otherwise expressly stated, you may not access or
                    reuse the Services, or any portion thereof, for any commercial purpose. Without our express
                    written consent, you may not (a) use any automated means to access the Platform or collect
                    any
                    information from the Platform (including without limitation robots, spiders or scripts), or
                    (b)
                    frame the Platform (or any part thereof), place pop-up windows over the Platform (or any
                    part
                    thereof) pages, or otherwise affect the display of part or area of the Platform.
Anti-Corruption Laws. You agree to comply with all applicable
                    anti-corruption
                    laws including laws that prohibit unlawful payments to anyone for a corrupt purpose in
                    relation
                    to these Terms.
Ownership and Reuse. Subject to these Terms, using the Services does not
                    give
                    you ownership of any intellectual or other property rights or interests in the Services or
                    the
                    Content you access. You must not use any branding or logos used in the Services unless
                    magicpin
                    has given you separate explicit written permission. You may not remove, obscure, or alter
                    any
                    legal notices displayed on the Platform or in relation to any Content. Unless you have
                    explicit
                    written permission, you must not reproduce, modify, rent, lease, sell, trade, distribute,
                    transmit, broadcast, publicly perform, create derivative works based on, or exploit for any
                    commercial purposes, any portion of the Content or use of, or access to, the Services
                    (including
                    Content, advertisements, APIs, and software).
Support. Unless otherwise expressly stated, magicpin does not promise to
                    provide
                    you with any support for the Services. If magicpin does provide you with support, it is at
                    magicpin's sole discretion and does not mean that we will continue to provide you with
                    support
                    in the future.
Fees. magicpin reserves the right to charge fees for use of or access to the
                    Services (and any associated support), whether currently in existence or not, in magicpin’s
                    sole
                    discretion. If magicpin decides to charge fees magicpin’s payment terms will apply and
                    magicpin
                    will provide you with prior notice.
Anti-Abuse Policy. magicpin prohibits sending unsolicited emails or messages
                    using the Services. You may not in connection with the Services engage in commercial
                    activity on
                    non-commercial properties or apps or high volume activity without magicpin’s prior written
                    consent. You may not engage in conduct or activity that is disruptive to the Services or the
                    experience of other users.
Your Account Notices
Account Information. You may need an account to use some Services. You must ensure
                    that
                    your account information (that is, the information you provided when you registered for or
                    subscribed to
                    a Service) remains current, complete, accurate and truthful. All magicpin accounts are
                    non-transferable,
                    and any rights to them terminate upon the account holder’s death. In order to create an account we
                    may
                    collect and keep possession of personal information such as your name, email address/Facebook user
                    name,
                    username, and your password("
Personal Data
"). By providing us with the same, you acknowledge
                    and
                    accept that we have your consent for the collection and processing of such Personal Data. Our
                    possession
                    and use of Personal Data shall be in accordance with our Privacy Policy and Terms.
Access to Your Account. You are responsible for all activity that happens on or
                    through
                    your account. To protect your account, keep your password confidential. Do not reuse your account
                    password with other services. If you forget your password and otherwise cannot validate your account
                    to
                    magicpin, you acknowledge and agree that your account may be inaccessible to you and that all data
                    associated with the account may not be retrievable.
Notices. magicpin may provide you with notices, including service announcements and
                    notices regarding changes to these Terms, by, but not limited to, email, regular mail, text message
                    or
                    SMS, MMS, push notification or in-app message, postings on the Services, telephone, or other
                    reasonable
                    means now known or hereafter developed. You consent to receive these notices by any and all of the
                    foregoing means. You may not receive notices if you violate the Terms by accessing the Services in
                    an
                    unauthorized manner, and you will be deemed to have received any and all notices that would have
                    been
                    delivered had you accessed the Services in an authorized manner.
Procedure for Copyright or Other Intellectual Property Infringement Claims or Claims of Violation of Other
            Rights
We respect the intellectual property as well as privacy of others, and we expect our
                    users to do the same in respect to their use of and activities on the magicpin platform. While a
                    substantial amount of content on the magicpin platform is user generated over which we do not
                    exercise
                    editorial control, we may, in appropriate circumstances and at our sole discretion subject to
                    applicable
                    law, block access to such content or delete such content, or disable, terminate, and/or take other
                    appropriate steps relating to the accounts of users who may be infringers. While we do not make any
                    editorial determination about the user generated content being posted and displayed and made
                    accessible
                    on the magicpin platform, if: (i) we receive any notice or communication that any content or any
                    part of
                    the content belongs to a party who has not consented to such content being uploaded and accessible
                    on
                    the magicpin platform or that it is violative of the rights of any person who has not consented to
                    such
                    content being uploaded and accessible on the magicpin platform; or (ii) it comes to our attention
                    that
                    any of the content violates any of the terms and conditions applicable to the magicpin platform, we
                    shall be entitled to remove such content/block public access to such content either temporarily or
                    permanently, subject to the provisions of the Indian Copyright Act, 1957, and the Information
                    Technology
                    Act, 2000, and as we deem fit or in compliance with the orders or directions of the court (if
                    applicable) and we shall have the right, at our discretion, to remove the infringer’s account, and
                    in
                    either case none of our users, partners, clients or vendors (including you) shall have no right to
                    make
                    any claims against us for removing or blocking such content;
Reporting Claims of Copyright Infringement

                    If you believe that your work (or the work of a third party on whose behalf you are entitled to act)
                    has
                    been copied in a way that constitutes copyright infringement, please file a copyright infringement
                    notice with us. The notice should be in writing and include, in the order set out below, the
                    following:
A statement that you have identified material on the Platform that infringes
                            your copyright (or infringes the copyright of a third party on whose behalf you are entitled
                            to
                            act);
A description of the copyrighted work that you claim has been infringed,
                            which
                            should include the type of work (such as a book or a sound recording) and any relevant
                            further
                            details (such as the title and date of publication, as applicable);
The country or countries to which your copyright applies;
A description of the way in which the copyright material has been infringed;
A description of where the material that you claim is infringing is located
                            on
                            our services (including a screen shot and link to the same);
Your address, telephone number, and email address so that we may get in
                            contact
                            with you;
A statement by you that you have a good faith belief that the disputed use
                            of
                            the copyrighted work is not authorized by the copyright owner (or by a third party who is
                            legally entitled to do so on behalf of the copyright owner) and is not otherwise permitted
                            by
                            law;
A statement by you, made under penalty of perjury, that the notice is
                            accurate
                            and that you are the copyright owner or authorized to act on the copyright owner's behalf.
Reporting claims of violation of other personal rights

                    If you believe that any Content on the Platform is violative of your (or that of someone you know
                    and
                    are authorized to act for) privacy or other personal rights please follow the following
                    instructions.
A statement that you have identified material on the Platform that infringes
                            your copyright (or infringes the copyright of a third party on whose behalf you are entitled
                            to
                            act);
A description of the way in which the copyright material has been infringed;
A description of where the material that you claim is infringing is located
                            on
                            our services (including a screen shot);
Your address, telephone number, and email address so that we may get in
                            contact
                            with you;
A statement by you, made under penalty of perjury, that the notice is
                            accurate.
A complaint can be submitted by contacting us at grievance@magicpin.in. Please be sure to
                    include responses to items i-viii of Clause (b) above (if the complaint is regarding copyright
                    infringement) or i-v of Clause (c) above (if the complaint is regarding the violation of other
                    personal
                    rights). If you are unsure whether there has been an infringement of your copyright or about your
                    rights
                    in the material, we suggest that you seek legal advice before reporting the material to us or
                    sending us
                    a counter-notice. Our response to your notice is regulated by applicable law. There may be negative
                    consequences if you falsely allege copyright infringement or report material to us in bad faith. In
                    addition, we may, in appropriate circumstances and at our discretion, disable, terminate, and/or
                    take
                    other appropriate steps relating to the accounts of users who may be repeat infringers.
Content in the Services and License Grant to magicpin
Content. Our Services display content that is not magicpin’s. This content is the
                    sole
                    responsibility of the entity or person that makes it available. magicpin assumes no responsibility
                    for
                    the conduct of third parties, including persons or entities with which you communicate using the
                    Services. Many of the Services enable you to submit content. You – not magicpin – are entirely
                    responsible for any content that you upload, post, email, transmit, or otherwise make available via
                    the
                    Services. We may remove and refuse to display content that violates the Terms or applicable laws or
                    regulations, but that does not mean that we monitor the Services or review or screen any content. By
                    using or accessing the Services you understand and agree that you may be exposed to offensive,
                    indecent,
                    or objectionable content.
IP Ownership and License Grant. Except as otherwise provided in the specific
                    guidelines
                    for a Service, when you upload, share with or submit content to the Services you retain ownership of
                    any
                    intellectual property rights that you hold in that content and you automatically grant magicpin a
                    worldwide, royalty-free, non-exclusive, perpetual, irrevocable, transferable, sublicensable license
                    to
                    (a) use, host, store, reproduce, modify, prepare derivative works (such as translations,
                    adaptations,
                    summaries or other changes), communicate, publish, publicly perform, publicly display, and
                    distribute
                    this content (in whole or in part, and /or incorporate in any other works) in any manner, mode of
                    delivery, technology or media now known or developed in the future; (b) display your Content (or
                    part
                    thereof, or any modification, adaptations, translations or derivative works thereto) online and
                    offline
                    and permit other (including without limitation magicpin’s co-brand partners) and (c) permit other
                    users
                    to access, reproduce, distribute, publicly display, prepare derivative works of, and publicly
                    perform
                    your content via the Services, as may be permitted by the functionality of those Services (e.g., for
                    users to re-blog, re-post or download your content). You must have the necessary rights to grant us
                    the
                    license described in this Section 6(b) for any content that you upload, share with or submit to the
                    Services.
Modifying and Terminating the Services; Terminating Accounts; Amendment of the Terms of Use
We are constantly innovating, changing and improving the Services. We may, without
                    notice, add or remove functionalities or features, create new limits to the Services, or temporarily
                    or
                    permanently suspend or stop a Service.
You can stop using the Services at any time. You may cancel and delete your account
                    at
                    any time here. However, you continuing to use the app constitutes your consent to us collecting
                    data,
                    mentioned within the terms, and processing the same.
You can withdraw consent to the use and/or processing of your personal data by
                    contacting us at care@magicpin.in and we shall remove the same shortly.
We may temporarily or permanently suspend or terminate your account or impose limits
                    on
                    or restrict your access to parts or all of the Services at any time, without notice and for any
                    reason,
                    including, but not limited to, violation of these Terms, court order, or inactivity.
If your account is terminated, access to your username, password, and all related
                    information, files, and content associated with your account may be terminated and your username may
                    be
                    recycled for use by others. However, some information may be retained in our files to prevent fraud,
                    troubleshoot problems, assist with any investigations, enforce our Terms of Use and/or comply with
                    legal
                    requirements.
We may amend these Terms at any time by informing you of the amended terms via email
                    to
                    your email address. Such amendments will be effective when we email a notice of the amendments to
                    you.
                    Alternatively or additionally, we may display amended terms to you when you access the Platform, in
                    which case such terms shall be effective when they are posted on the Platform.
Force Majeure
Without prejudice to any other provision herein, magicpin shall not be liable for
                    any
                    loss, damage or penalty as a result of any delay in or failure to deliver or otherwise perform
                    hereunder
                    due to any cause beyond magicpin’s control, including, without limitation, acts of the User or other
                    Users, embargo or other governmental act, regulation or request affecting the conduct of magicpin’s
                    business, fire, explosion, accident, theft, vandalism, riot, acts of war, strikes or other labour
                    difficulties, lightning, flood, windstorm or other acts of God.
Our Warranties and Disclaimers
TO THE FULLEST EXTENT PERMITTED BY APPLICABLE LAW, MAGICPIN, ITS PARENT COMPANIES,
                    SUBSIDIARIES, AFFILIATES, OFFICERS, DIRECTORS, EMPLOYEES, CONTRACTORS, AGENTS, PARTNERS, LICENSORS
                    AND
                    DISTRIBUTORS (COLLECTIVELY
“MAGICPIN ENTITIES”
) DO NOT MAKE ANY REPRESENTATIONS, PROMISES, OR
                    WARRANTIES, EXPRESS OR IMPLIED, ABOUT THE SERVICES. WE PROVIDE OUR SERVICES “AS-IS,” “WITH ALL
                    FAULTS,”
                    AND “AS AVAILABLE.” YOUR USE OF THE SERVICES, INCLUDING CONTENT WITHIN THE SERVICES, IS AT YOUR OWN
                    RISK
                    AND WE DO NOT REPRESENT, PROMISE, OR WARRANT THAT THE SERVICES WILL BE UNINTERRUPTED, TIMELY,
                    SECURE, OR
                    ERROR-FREE. YOU UNDERSTAND AND AGREE THAT NO DATA TRANSMISSION OVER THE INTERNET OR INFORMATION
                    STORAGE
                    TECHNOLOGY CAN BE GUARANTEED TO BE SECURE, AND MAGICPIN EXPRESSLY DISCLAIMS ANY WARRANTIES, EXPRESS
                    OR
                    IMPLIED, TO THAT EFFECT. WE MAKE NO COMMITMENTS, PROMISES OR WARRANTIES ABOUT THE CONTENT WITHIN THE
                    SERVICES OR CONTENT LINKED FROM THE SERVICES, THE SUPPORT WE PROVIDE FOR THE SERVICES, THE SPECIFIC
                    FUNCTIONS OF THE SERVICES, THE SECURITY OF THE SERVICES, OR THE SERVICES’ RELIABILITY, QUALITY,
                    ACCURACY, AVAILABILITY, OR ABILITY TO MEET YOUR NEEDS, PROVIDE CERTAIN OUTPUTS OR ACHIEVE CERTAIN
                    RESULTS.
SOME JURISDICTIONS PROVIDE FOR CERTAIN IMPLIED WARRANTIES, SUCH AS THE IMPLIED
                    WARRANTY
                    OF MERCHANTABILITY, FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE AND NON-INFRINGEMENT. TO THE FULLEST EXTENT
                    PERMITTED BY APPLICABLE LAW, WE DISCLAIM ANY AND ALL IMPLIED OR EXPRESS PROMISES OR WARRANTIES ABOUT
                    THE
                    SERVICES.
Limitation of Liability
TO THE FULLEST EXTENT PERMITTED BY APPLICABLE LAW, YOU AGREE AND UNDERSTAND THAT
                    MAGICPIN ENTITIES WILL NOT BE LIABLE FOR: ANY INDIRECT, SPECIAL, INCIDENTAL, CONSEQUENTIAL, TREBLE
                    OR
                    OTHER MULTIPLES OF DAMAGES, EXEMPLARY OR PUNITIVE DAMAGES ARISING FROM OR IN CONNECTION WITH THESE
                    TERMS
                    OR YOUR USE OF THE SERVICES. MAGICPIN ENTITIES ARE NOT RESPONSIBLE FOR ANY LOST PROFITS, LOST
                    REVENUES,
                    LOST BUSINESS OPPORTUNITIES, DIMINUTION IN VALUE, INCLUDING ANY ALLEGED LOSS OR DIMINUTION IN VALUE
                    OF
                    PERSONAL INFORMATION, OR ANY OTHER LOSSES (COLLECTIVELY, “LOSSES”) ARISING FROM OR IN CONNECTION
                    WITH
                    THESE TERMS OR YOUR USE OF OR ACCESS TO THE SERVICES, INCLUDING, BUT NOT LIMITED TO, LOSSES
                    RESULTING
                    FROM OR IN CONNECTION WITH: THE DELETION OF, ALTERATION OF, MIS-DELIVERY OF, OR FAILURE TO STORE
                    DATA
                    MAINTAINED OR TRANSMITTED BY THE SERVICES; THE LIMITING, SUSPENSION OR TERMINATION OF YOUR ACCOUNT;
                    YOUR
                    DOWNLOADING OR SHARING OF INFORMATION, INCLUDING PERSONAL INFORMATION, VIA THE SERVICES; THE
                    UNAUTHORIZED ACCESS TO YOUR ACCOUNT OR ANY DATA MAINTAINED OR TRANSMITTED BY THE SERVICES; LINKS
                    PROVIDED BY THE SERVICES OR THIRD PARTIES TO EXTERNAL SITES OR RESOURCES; YOUR DEALINGS WITH OR
                    PARTICIPATION IN PROMOTIONS OF ADVERTISERS FOUND ON OR THROUGH THE SERVICES; OR ANY GOOD OR SERVICES
                    SOLD BY SUCH ADVERTISERS. MAGICPIN ENTITIES WILL NOT BE LIABLE FOR PROBLEMS CAUSED BY OTHERS, THE
                    WRONGFUL OR UNLAWFUL ACTIONS OF THIRD PARTIES, OR AN ACT OF GOD. THE LIMITATIONS AND EXCLUSIONS IN
                    THESE
                    TERMS WILL APPLY WHETHER OR NOT MAGICPIN HAS BEEN ADVISED OF OR SHOULD HAVE BEEN AWARE OF THE
                    POSSIBILITY OF ANY LOSSES ARISING.
TO THE FULLEST EXTENT PERMITTED BY LAW, MAGICPIN ENTITIES ARE NOT LIABLE IN
                    CONNECTION
                    WITH ANY DISPUTES THAT ARISE OUT OF OR RELATE TO THESE TERMS OR SERVICES FOR ANY AMOUNT GREATER THAN
                    THE
                    AMOUNT YOU PAID TO US FOR THE SERVICES.
Community Standards and Guidelines
Our primary objective is to empower people to discover and engage with other people, places
                            and
                            communities in their neighbourhood. We believe that You, as a User, play the most important
                            role
                            in helping us do this every day – this is your platform. Every day, people come to magicpin
                            to
                            share their moments, discover and connect with new friends and earn rewards for spreading
                            more
                            magic, subject to reasonable restrictions.
magicpin is about local, social communities. This is the reason we recommend all users to
                            post,
                            share and recommend content specific to places and experiences in their neighbourhood. The
                            follow guidelines will help everyone build a better community around them:
We recommend you to complete your profile – this will help other
                                    users
                                    discover, and engage with you based on similar interests.
The User is encouraged to post and share your moments at
                                    restaurants,
                                    salons, clubs, and other interesting places in your locality, with their stories in
                                    caption. Please always add the relevant location in context to the post.
Putting up posts which capture the essence of the place and their
                                    experiences will help your fellow users understand the outlet better.
The User is also encouraged to ask questions about different places
                                    and
                                    experiences and get feedback and reviews from co-users on the platform.
Liking posts randomly (people at their homes, not in proper dresses,
                                    hazy pictures, not looking at the camera) is discouraged.
Comments to a post not pertaining to or related to the post, person,
                                    place or their review on the experience are also discouraged. Please try and make
                                    the
                                    comments interesting so that other users also look up to you and want to stay in
                                    touch
                                    with you.
Posting any misleading links in comments, and content that expresses
                                    obscenity, vulgarity, hatred, racism, or gratuitous violence is prohibited, and will
                                    face disciplinary action, including but not limited to permanent ban.
General Code of Conduct: magicpin wishes for each User to have a safe and pleasant
                            experience
                            while on our platform. As a user of the magicpin app you should uphold these following codes
                            of
                            conduct inter alia, subject to periodic review and change by magicpin, as this is your app
                            and
                            your community:
You will not threaten, stalk, defame, defraud, degrade, victimize or
                                    intimidate an individual or group of individuals for any reason.
You are responsible for any interaction with other users.
You agree that you will not collect any personal information of other magicpin
                                    users.
You must not use the service for any illegal purpose.
You must not try to restrict other users from using the app.
You may not reproduce, copy, or redistribute the design or layout of this website or
                                    mobile application, individual elements of the website or mobile application design, or our logos
                                    without our express written permission.
Privacy Policy
The information we learn from customers helps us personalise and continually improve your shopping
                experience at magicpin. We use your information to assist in handling a variety of matters including but
                not
                related to , communicate with you about vouchers, products, services and promotional offers, update our
                records and generally maintain your accounts with us, display content and recommend merchandise and
                services
                that might be of interest to you. We also use this information to improve our platform, prevent or
                detect
                fraud or abuses of our website and enable you to have a grand experience. We use Cookies and Device Data
                that allow us to connect your activity within the Platform with other information we store about you in
                your
                profile or as related to your interactions with the Site. We collect information to provide better
                services
                to all our users – from figuring out basic stuff such as which language you speak, to more complex
                things
                like which services you find helpful or which services are available in your current location. The
                information magicpin collects, and how that information is used, depends on how frequently you use our
                services and how you manage your privacy controls internally within your device. We use the information
                we
                collect to customise our services for you, including providing recommendations and personalised content.
                We
                will ask for your explicit consent to share any sensitive personal information. Additionally, we will
                also
                ask for your consent before using your information for a purpose that isn’t covered in this Privacy
                Policy.
User Information
The Application obtains the information you provide when you download and
                            register the Application.
When you register with us and use the Application, you generally provide (a)
                            your name, email address, phone number and other registration information; (b)
                            transaction-related information, such as when you make purchases and/or upload a selfie,
                            respond
                            to any offers, or download or use any applications from us; (c) information you provide us
                            when
                            you contact us for help; (d) any other information you enter into our system when using the
                            Application, such as contact information and project management information.
The Application may also collect certain information automatically,
                            including,
                            but not limited to, the type of mobile device you use, your mobile devices unique device ID,
                            circle of the IP address of your mobile device, your mobile operating system, the type of
                            mobile
                            Internet browsers you use, and information about the way you use the Application.
We may use the information you provided us to contact you from time to time
                            to
                            provide you with important information, required notices and marketing promotions and also
                            improve your activities on our platform such as posting in our forums, liking posts, sending
                            feedback, and responding to surveys. If you choose to share data about yourself via your
                            profile, chat, or other interactive areas of the Application, please be advised that all
                            data
                            you disclose in these areas is public and your data will be accessible to anyone who
                            accesses
                            the Application. magicpin shall not be liable for any data that you had chosen to disclose
                            yourself in this public space.
We may also use your personal information to improve our services and user
                            experience on the Application, to enforce our legal rights as permitted under law, and
                            otherwise
                            with your consent.
You may restrict our access to such information by terminating your account
                            on
                            magicpin or removing magicpin’s permission to access the same by directly disabling the same
                            on
                            your phone. The User may note that the latter may severely restrict magicpin’s ability to
                            provide a personalised feel to the Platform.
Geo-Location Information
We collect information about your location when you use our services, which
                            helps us in determining the merchants and outlets near you where magicpin vouchers can be
                            used
                            or cashback can be availed. Your location can be determined with varying degrees of accuracy
                            by:
                            (a) GPS; (b) IP address; (c) Sensor data from your device; (d) Information about things near
                            your device, such as Wifi Access Points, cell towers and Bluetooth enabled devices.
We may request access or permission to and track location-based information
                            from
                            your mobile device while you are using the Application, to provide location-based services.
                            We
                            may also collect the precise location of your device when the app is running in the
                            foreground,
                            background, or even if you are not directly using the application depending on your device
                            and
                            its settings. Your device, as well as the magicpin mobile app, provides you with options to
                            control how and when we collect your geolocation. This is only to better the User’s
                            experience
                            on the magicpin Platform.
You may be able to disallow our use of certain location data through your
                            device
                            or browser settings, for example, by disabling “Location” services for the magicpin
                            application
                            in your device privacy settings. By allowing magicpin access to the same the User
                            acknowledges
                            and accepts that magicpin shall be aware of the User’s Geo-Location at any time. If you wish
                            to
                            change our access or permissions, you may do so in your device’s settings.
Contacts Information
Please note that no other contacts information other than the phone numbers and thereto attached names and email addresses will be collected and used from Your address book. 
                            Other numbers or information that may be contained in your address book will be filtered away by our safety algorithms and will therefore not be collected by magicpin. 
                            Please also note that You can always choose not to share Contacts Information with magicpin.
Friends on magicpin help you discover the coolest things in town. From best food outlets to best picnic spots, your connects keep you up to date with latest trends.
When you turn on phone contacts uploading, information from your phone contacts will be continuously uploaded. This makes it easier to find the people you already know.
Financial Information
Availing the services offered by magicpin can at times involve the
                            collection of
                            sensitive financial information including but not limited to linking with mobile wallets,
                            entering credit/debit card details, password, etc to facilitate payment for the respective
                            service. You acknowledge and accept that linking magicpin with relevant mobile wallet or
                            bank
                            account helps in making the experience better and thereby expressly consent to magicpin’s
                            collection and subsequent processing of such financial data.
The financial information we learn and gather from you is used to link
                            magicpin
                            with your preferred mobile wallet, verify your identity to permit you to undertake
                            transactions
                            (including to facilitate and process payments) in connection with magicpin, communicate with
                            you
                            about any promotional offers, services or updates associated with magicpin, conduct analysis
                            on
                            the users’ spending capability and generally maintain your accounts with us. No information
                            collated while carrying out the above is shared with or sold to a third party by magicpin
                            and is
                            strongly protected. You acknowledge and accept that the above activities that involve
                            magicpin’s
                            use of your financial information is to improve your experience on the magicpin platform and
                            hereby provide magicpin consent for the same.
We work to protect the security of your information during transmission by
                            encrypting all financial information, including passwords, you input in addition to
                            maintaining
                            security of such information. User authentication is handled by magicpin through
                            authentication
                            tokens that is reset on every fresh one time password validation. We reveal only the last
                            four
                            digits of your credit / debit card numbers while making payment. Of course, we transmit the
                            entire credit / debit card number to the appropriate credit / debit card company or the
                            concerned bank for processing of the transaction.
We maintain physical, electronic and procedural safeguards in connection
                            with
                            the collection, storage and disclosure of such sensitive personal information.
You may disable magicpin’s access to the same remotely on the magicpin
                            Platform
                            or contact us at care@magicpin.in.
Health Information
If while purchasing any healthcare product or services, you upload the
                            invoice
                            of the same or use magicpin voucher(s) or magicpay to purchase the same, magicpin would gain
                            access to information on such invoice(s) which may include your sensitive personal health
                            information.
You hereby expressly consent to magicpin gaining access and storing such
                            information and processing the same in the manner set out in these terms.
magicpin shall have the rights in the above clause (b) unless you expressly
                            withdraw the consent you have given us, by contacting us with such request at
                            care@magicpin.in.
Third Party Access to User Information
We will share your information with third parties only in the ways that are
                            described in this privacy statement.
We may disclose User Provided and Automatically Collected Information unless
                            consent to the same has been specifically withdrawn by the User.
We will not share your contact information at any point without your prior
                            content, but your selfies, comments and other actions specific to our system might be
                            visible to
                            other users and merchants on the platform. However, without your prior consent such users
                            will
                            not have access to your contact information. You, as a User, have the ability, to remove
                            your
                            information from the system and to restrict our access and use of your personal data;
We shall provide all information that is to be provided when required by
                            law,
                            such as to comply with a summons, or similar legal process as well as when we believe in
                            good
                            faith that disclosure is necessary to protect our rights, protect your safety or the safety
                            of
                            others, investigate fraud, or respond to a government request;
Our trusted services providers who work on our behalf, do not have an
                            independent use of the information we disclose to them, and have agreed to adhere to the
                            rules
                            set forth in this privacy statement and apply data protection measures, at least equal to
                            those
                            set out below in the section “Data Security Measures”.
If in the event that Samast Technologies is involved in a merger,
                            acquisition,
                            or sale of all or a portion of its assets, you will be notified via email and/or a prominent
                            notice on our Web site of any change in ownership or uses of this information, as well as
                            any
                            choices you may have regarding this information.
We also may share data that is not linkable to a particular consumer or
                            device
                            (for example, information that has been aggregated with other records) for general business
                            purposes.
Data Security Measures
magicpin takes security of your data very seriously. We work hard to protect information you provide from loss, misuse, and unauthorised access or disclosure.
We maintain commercially reasonable and standard measures to maintain information security and prevent it from unauthorized access. However, given the nature of communications and information processing technology, magicpin cannot guarantee that any information, during transmission through the internet or while being processed, will be absolutely safe from intrusion by others.
If magicpin becomes aware of any breach of security of your information, We will notify you using the email address that We have. If you do not agree to the terms discussed above, you may exit magicpin or stop using the same. When you access Our App, you acknowledge that you have read and agreed to abide by the terms described above.
Data Retention Policy
We will retain User Provided data for as long as you use the Application and
                            for
                            a reasonable time thereafter.
We will retain Automatically Collected information for up to 24 months and
                            thereafter may store it in aggregate.
If you would like us to delete User Provided Data that you have provided via
                            the
                            Application, please contact us at care@magicpin.in and we will respond in a reasonable time.
The User must note that some or all the User Provided Data may be required
                            in
                            order for the Application to function properly.
Tracking Technologies
We may use cookies, web beacons, tracking pixels, and other tracking
                            technologies on the Application to help customize the Application and improve your
                            experience.
                            When you access the Application, your personal information is not collected using tracking
                            technology. Most browsers are set to accept cookies by default. You can remove or reject
                            cookies
                            but be aware that such action could affect the availability and functionality of the
                            Application.
The Application may contain links to third-party websites and applications
                            of
                            interest, including advertisements and external services, that are not affiliated with us.
                            Once
                            you have used these links to leave the Application, any information you provide to these
                            third
                            parties is not covered by this Privacy Policy, and we cannot guarantee the safety and
                            privacy of
                            your information. Before visiting and providing any information to any third-party websites,
                            you
                            should inform yourself of the privacy policies and practices (if any) of the third party
                            responsible for that website, and should take those steps necessary to, in your discretion,
                            protect the privacy of your information. We are not responsible for the content or privacy
                            and
                            security practices and policies of any third parties, including other sites, services or
                            applications that may be linked to or from the Application.
Release of User Information: We release account and other personal information when
                    we
                    believe release is appropriate to comply with applicable law; enforce or apply our Conditions of Use
                    and
                    other agreements; or protect the rights, property or safety of merchants, our users or others. This
                    includes exchanging information with other companies, organisations, government or regulatory
                    authorities for fraud protection and credit risk reduction. Obviously, however, this does not
                    include
                    selling, renting, sharing or otherwise disclosing personally identifiable information from customers
                    for
                    commercial purposes in a way that is contrary to the commitments made in this Privacy Notice
Disclosure of Information
to report or collect on payments owed to Sellers, merchants or other
                            business
                            partners;
as necessary to perform contractual obligations towards you with merchant to
                            the
                            extent you have purchased or redeemed a voucher for goods or services offered by a merchant
                            or
                            participated in an offer, rewards, contest or other activity or program sponsored or offered
                            through us or the Sellers on behalf of a merchant;
in case of a merger, acquisition or reorganization with a purchaser of our
                            company or all or substantially all of our assets;
to comply with legal orders and government requests, or as needed to support
                            auditing, compliance;
to combat fraud or criminal activity, and to protect our rights or those of
                            our
                            affiliates, business partners and users, or as part of legal proceedings affecting
                            magicpin;
in response to a legal process, including to law enforcement agencies,
                            regulators, and courts; or
with your consent or as otherwise required or permitted by law.
User Opt-out: The User can choose to stop all collection of information by the
                    Application easily by uninstalling the Application. You may use the standard uninstall processes as
                    may
                    be available as part of your mobile device or via the mobile application marketplace or network. You
                    can
                    also request to opt-out via email, at care@magicpin.in.
magicpin shall not engage in any use of the Application to knowingly solicit data
                    from
                    or market to children under the age of 13. While it is our constant endeavour to show minors only
                    age-appropriate content through various internal checks, such as age verification at the time of
                    registration, directly or through Facebook, Community Guidelines and others that are updated
                    periodically, if a parent or guardian becomes aware that his or her child has provided us with
                    information without their consent, he or she should contact us at care@magicpin.in. We will delete
                    such
                    information from our files within a reasonable time.
You may at any time review or change the information in your account or terminate
                    your
                    account. If your magicpin user account is terminated or deleted, access to your username, password,
                    and
                    all related information, files, and content associated with your account shall be terminated.
                    However,
                    some information may be retained in our files to prevent fraud, troubleshoot problems, assist with
                    any
                    investigations, enforce our Terms of Use and/or comply with legal requirements.
By using or continuing to use magicpin, you agree to our use of your information
                    (including your personal information and/or your sensitive personal data or information) in
                    accordance
                    with this Privacy Policy, as may be amended from time to time by magicpin in its discretion. You
                    also
                    agree and consent to us collecting, storing, processing, transferring and sharing information
                    (including
                    sensitive personal data or information) related to you with third parties or service providers for
                    the
                    purposes as set out in this Privacy Policy.
You may contact us at care@magicpin.in if you wish to obtain: (a) confirmation on
                    whether your respective Personal Data has been processed or is being processed; (b) brief summary of
                    your respective Personal Data that has been processed or is being processed; and (c) brief summary
                    of
                    the Terms. You may also contact us if you wish any respective information to be corrected or removed
                    or
                    deleted.
Direct Payment Facility
The User may, if easier, opt to make direct payment of such purchase price to
                    magicpin
                    for the purchased goods or services (“
Direct Payment Facility
”). In the event that You make
                    any
                    payment in the above-mentioned manner, magicpin shall be deemed to be the agent of the respective
                    merchant authorised to collect such purchase price from You on behalf of the merchant.
Any and all communication by magicpin or the merchant regarding the Direct Payment
                    Facility, whether to magicpin users, your customers or clients, our respective vendors, employees or
                    agents, governmental authorities or any other person or entity whatsoever shall clearly indicate
                    that
                    magicpin is acting purely as an agent in relation to the Direct Payment Facility
Feedback
You agree that any recommendation, idea, proposal, suggestion, feedback or other input (“Feedback”) you
                submit to magicpin related to its services, websites, apps, or technology may be used by magicpin
                without
                any notice, obligation, restriction, reimbursement or compensation to you and you waive (or agree not to
                enforce) any and all rights that may now or in future exist (including moral and equivalent rights) in
                any
                Feedback.
magicpin Loyalty Rewards Programme
To make the magicpin experience more fun and fulfilling we have a discretionary
                    unique
                    reward programme for our loyal users. When you purchase any product or service from any of our
                    participating merchants and you verify the transaction on the magicpin app by uploading your selfie
                    clicked at the merchant outlet and the bill showing the date and the amount, and take such other
                    steps
                    as many be instructed on the app, certain reward points are added to your account.
You may use the points in your account to purchase vouchers issued by magicpin which
                    you
                    may use at specified locations as indicated at the time you purchase the voucher. Presently magicpin
                    sells vouchers which can be used at merchants such as McDonald's, Pizza Hut, Hard Rock Cafe,
                    BookMyShow,
                    Flipkart, Myntra, etc.
The reward programme is being offered at our discretion and we reserve the right to
                    cancel or discontinue the reward programme and/or change the terms of the programme, without any
                    liability whatsoever to you. You agree that you shall have no rights or claims of whatsoever nature
                    against us in such event.
If you have any questions regarding the rewards programme, write to us at
                    care@magicpin.in.
About these Terms
Third Party Beneficiaries and Conflicts. These Terms control the relationship
                    between
                    magicpin and you. They do not create any third party beneficiary rights. If there is a conflict or
                    inconsistency between the terms in this document and the additional terms associated with a
                    particular
                    Service, the additional terms will control solely for that conflict or inconsistency.
Modification of the Terms. We may modify the Terms from time to time to keep in
                    compliance with current law as well any future legislations that aim to protect information and
                    privacy.
                    Unless we indicate otherwise, modifications will be effective as of the date they are posted on this
                    page or any successor page. You should look at the Terms regularly. We will provide notice (in
                    accordance with Section 3(c) above) of material modifications.
Continued Use of the Services. You may stop using the Services at any time, but your
                    continued use of or subscription to a Service after the effective date of any modifications to the
                    Terms
                    means that you agree to the Terms as modified as well as consent to magicpin’s collection and
                    processing
                    of User data.
Waiver and Severability of Terms. The failure of magicpin to exercise or enforce any
                    right or provision of these Terms will not constitute a waiver of such right or provision. If any
                    provision (or part of a provision) of these Terms is found to be invalid, magicpin and you
                    nevertheless
                    agree to give effect to the intentions as reflected in the provision, and the other provisions of
                    these
                    Terms remain in full force and effect.
Assignment by magicpin. magicpin may freely assign these Terms and all of the
                    policies
                    and other documents incorporated or referenced in it (including all rights, licenses, and
                    obligations
                    under it or them), in whole or in part and without notice, for any reason, including for the purpose
                    of
                    internal restructuring (for example, mergers or liquidations).
Indemnification
You agree to defend, indemnify, and hold harmless magicpin and all magicpin Entities
                    from and against all claims and expenses, including, without limitation, attorneys’ fees, arising
                    out
                    of, related to, or in connection with any of the following: (a) any User Content submitted or posted
                    by
                    you on the platform, or any use of the platform in violation of these Terms of Use; (b) fraud you
                    commit
                    or your intentional misconduct or gross negligence; or (c) your violation of any applicable laws or
                    rights of a third-party.
You are solely responsible for your interactions with merchants as well as other
                    users
                    on the platform. To the extent permitted under applicable laws, you hereby release magicpin from any
                    and
                    all claims or liability related to any product or service of a merchant, without limitation, but not
                    limited to any harm caused to you by action or inaction of a merchant, a merchant’s failure to
                    comply
                    with applicable law and any conduct, speech or User Content, whether online or offline, of any other
                    third-party.
Contact Us
Grievance Officer/Nodal Officer
In accordance with (1) Information Technology Act, 2000 and rules made there under, and (2) Consumer Protection (E-Commerce) Rules 2020 the name and contact details of the Grievance Officer/Nodal Officer is provided below:
Tarun Kumar
(Chief Compliance Officer)
grievance@magicpin.in
,
care@magicpin.in
Plot No. 379-380, Sector 29, Near IFFCO Chowk Metro Station, Gurugram-122001
If you believe that magicpin has not adhered to this Privacy Policy (as set out
                    under
                    clause 10) you may write to magicpin at the following e-mail address: grievance@magicpin.in. In your
                    email,
                    please describe in as much detail as possible ways in which you believe the Privacy Policy has not
                    been
                    complied with. We will investigate your complaint within reasonable period of time.
We will do our best to resolve any disputes about these Terms of Use. If you wish to
                    bring a legal claim against us, these Terms, as well as all user activity on the magicpin Platform
                    shall
                    be governed by and construed in accordance with the laws of India.
You agree that all claims, differences or disputes arising under or in connection
                    with
                    or in relation hereto the magicpin Platform, the Terms, relating to or in connection with these
                    Terms,
                    or transactions entered into on or through magicpin, or any content uploaded on the magicpin
                    Platform or
                    the relationship between User and magicpin shall be subject to the exclusive jurisdiction of the
                    courts
                    at Delhi and the User hereby accedes to and accepts the jurisdiction of such courts.
Cancellation and refund policy:
Cancellation due to reasons not attributable to magicpin, that is, in the event you provide incorrect phone numbers, delivery address, or that you were unresponsive while either of our team or the rider team tried to reach out or, not reachable or unavailable during the delivery of the services offered to you, shall be non-refundable in nature.
There may be cases where magicpin is either unable to accept your order or cancels the order, due to reasons including without limitation, technical errors, unavailability of the item(s) ordered, or any other reason attributable to magicpin, Restaurant Partner/Store or Delivery Partner. In such cases, magicpin shall not charge a cancellation charge from you. If the order is canceled after payment has been charged, you are eligible for a refund of the order value or any part thereof, the said amount will be reversed to you.
No replacement / refund / or any other resolution will be provided without Restaurant Partner’s/Store(s)’ permission. We will need to verify the details from the store before we proceed with any refund.
Any complaint, with respect to the order which shall include instances but not be limited to food spillage, foreign objects in food, delivery of the wrong order or food and beverages or Products, poor quality, You will be required to share the proof of the same before any resolution can be provided. In the absence of the proof, magicpin will not consider the request as valid request and refund or replacement will not be provided in such cases.
You shall not be entitled to a refund in case instructions placed along with the order are not followed in the form and manner You had intended. Instructions are followed by the Restaurant Partner /Store on a best-efforts basis.
All refunds shall be processed in the same manner as they are received, unless refunds have been provided to You in the form of credits, refund amount will reflect in your account based on respective banks policies.
How magicpin app works?
Go to any outlet of your choice, and use the magicpin app camera to click a selfie from inside the outlet! Post the selfie, picture of the bill (dated the same day as selfie) and earn free cashback in magicpin points (upto 100% of the bill value). Please ensure that the selfie & bill are clear.
Cashback
Cashback may not be credited if one or more of the following conditions are true:
Selfie
Selfie is unclear.
Selfie does not belong to you.
Selfie was not from inside the outlet.
Selfie is taken from any other device.
Outlet's interior is not clear from the selfie shared.
You have claimed cashback from this outlet earlier in the day.
Bill
Bill is unclear / cropped / tampered / punched / handwritten without stamp.
Bill has already been used by someone else or is a duplicate.
Bill is not from the same day.
Bill was not a customer copy/guest's copy.
Bill had a discount from merchant's end / voucher was applied / it was a party-package.
Bill is generated before final payment i.e. Token/ estimated cash memo/counter bills.
Bill is a home-delivery bill.
Bill is not for a purchase made by you at the outlet you have checked-in from.
Other
If you are using multiple accounts or sharing requests from more than one account.
If the request is shared from a locality where we are not yet live.
If our partner merchant has marked you as an store employee/delivery boy.
Redemption
Cashback is credited to your magicpin wallet, and can be used to redeem McDonald's, Pizza Hut, Hard Rock Cafe, BookMyShow, Flipkart, Myntra, Mobile Recharge and other exciting vouchers!
Your magicpin points will be activated after you claim a successful cashback at a merchant using a valid selfie and bill.
The points issued shall be valid for a period of 30 days from issuance, which may however be extended at the discretion of the Company based on factors including history of user activity in the last 90 days for points generation, redemption etc. This policy is subject to periodic review.
List of Suspicious Activities
magicpin follows zero-tolerance policy against any kind of activity that is against the T&Cs.
The suspicious behavior includes one or more activities from the below list:
Usage of multiple instances of magicpin app.
Any app that helps in faking/spoofing the location, IP or device ID of the user.
Multiple accounts usage by the same user.
Note
- If you are facing issues after removing the above set of apps.Please restart your device and try again.
Your Privacy Is Our Priority
*magicpin may reach out to you for exciting offers via app, email or SMS.
magicPro FAQs:
What is magicPro?
magicPro is a one-of-a-kind membership plan that offers real savings at local stores for the first time in India. You get unlimited free deliveries and maximum discounts every time you transact on magicpin without the hassle of earning magicPoints. If you love finding the best deals and shopping at your local stores, as well as online stores, this is the right plan for you.
There’s an additional benefit too!
Your membership is safe-guarded with our money-back guarantee. If you save less than what you have paid for the magicPro membership, we’ll refund the balance amount!
Is there a limit on magicPoints usage?
The limit for every user is set at the maximum value. Since we have a Fair Usage Policy on magicpin, users can enjoy maximum savings worth ₹15,000 every month.
How much does the membership cost?
We have 3 plans available for the magicPro membership; a monthly plan for ₹149, 3-month for ₹449 and a 6-month plan for ₹899.
However, early birds get huge savings on our membership plans also (for limited duration only).
		The monthly plan costs just ₹69, the 3-month plan costs just ₹299 and the 6-month plan costs only ₹499.
Can I upgrade or cancel my membership?
magicPro membership once purchased cannot be cancelled or upgraded to other plans.
How can I connect with the magicPro Helpdesk?
You can raise a ticket through our Helpdesk and our magicPro team will get in touch with you to address all your concerns.
Where can I find my membership status?
Once you become a magicPro member, you can check your membership status and all details related to it. Follow these simple steps:
Visit the ‘Accounts’ section on the magicpin app
Click on ‘My magicPro membership’ banner
App Usage
Q. How to claim a deal?
Follow these simple steps to get started-
Open magicpin App
Click on ‘Claim’ button at the bottom right corner of the window.
Search for the name of the outlet you are visiting and click “Claim”
Click selfie from inside the outlet
Take a picture of your bill. Make sure all four corners of bill are captured in the picture.
Write a cool caption and enter bill amount.
Click on submit and see your wallet become heavier!
Q. How to use wallet balance?
Click on the left topmost corner on the homepage of your magicpin app .There you will find several options like Home, Redeem Points, Transactions etc .
Go to the Redeem Points section and click on ‘Search’ on the right top most corner.
To recharge your phone, type ‘prepaid mobile recharge’/’Postpaid mobile recharge’. Or you can check out the amazing vouchers available from the list.
Q. How to recharge my phone?
Follow these simple steps to recharge from your wallet:-
Click on the top-left corner of your App select 'Redeem Points'.
Select or search "postpaid/prepaid recharge/prepaid data recharge" in wallet section that appears according to your requirement.
Enter the 10 digit mobile number which you want to recharge and select 'operator' from the dropdown.
Select your recharge amount and click on 'Buy Now'.
Your recharge will be done instantly. Feel free to reach out to us if you don't get your talk-time in 24 hours.
Q. How to check my wallet balance?
Click on the left topmost corner on the homepage of your magicpin app .There you can find several options like Home, redeem points , transactions etc .
Go in the redeem points section and your wallet page with wallet balance will open.
Q. When will my wallet points expire?
The points issued shall be valid for a period of 30 days from issuance, which may however be extended at the discretion of the Company based on factors including history of user activity in the last 90 days for points generation, redemption etc. This policy is subject to periodic review.
Q. I have enough magicpin points but it's redirecting me to payment page. Why?
To use wallet balance one successful transaction with the bill is mandatory. As you might not have completed your first successful transaction therefore you are not able to use wallet balance.Complete one successful transaction with bill to use the wallet balance.
Q. How many times can i avail cashback?
You can claim any number of cashback in a day from food outlets.  However only one cashback can be claimed per outlet in a day.
Cashback
Q. Do you accept discounted bills?
Discounted bills are not accepted by the system.Please note that we don't provide cashback if any discount/offer/voucher/coupon has been applied on the bill.
Q. What if I order food online?
Unfortunately, cashback can not be credited for selfies from home/home delivery bills . Only  in store bills and selfie from store are accepted.
Q. How much time does it takes to process any claim.
Generally it takes upto 2-3 hours   but in the case of heavy traffics/adding new merchant it might take 24 hours. Please let us know if you haven’t received your cashback in 24 hrs. We will look in to that.
Q. How to avail maximum cashback?
You can book a deal in advance when cashback is high to avail maximum cashback.For booking a deal , follow these steps : open your magicpin app > click on the search deal , the icon in the right topmost corner > type the name of the outlet in the search bar > click on book deal . After doing this while claiming deal you can see that coupon code generated due to blocking the deal is auto filled in the coupon code area and you will get maximum cashback ..
Q. Is it necessary to take selfie from inside the outlet?
Yes, you must take selfie from inside the store.Selfie from outside the store are not accepted by the system.
Q. Do you accept handwritten bills?
We do not provide cashback on handwritten bill, we accept printed/stamped bills only with all the details like name, address of the outlet, date etc mentioned on it.
Q. Can my friend share the same bill that i have shared?
One bill can be processed only once.
Q. I took a lot of selfies at the outlet. Can I share them on the App?
The selfies must be clicked & sent using the camera button on the magicpin App. You will not be able to share selfies/images which are stored in your gallery.
Q. Is there any limit of number of transactions?
There is no limit but only one transaction allowed at one fashion store by a user in one week and only one transaction is allowed per week from beauty outlets.
Q. Can I claim bill of yesterday?
Sorry, outdated bills are not valid for cashback. Your bill should be of same day only.
Recharge
Q. How to recharge my phone?
Follow these simple steps to recharge from your wallet:-
Select 'Redeem Points' from App menu.
Search "postpaid/prepaid recharge/prepaid data recharge" in wallet section, according to your requirement.
Enter the 10-digit mobile number which you want to recharge and select 'operator' from the dropdown.
Select your recharge amount and click on 'Buy Now'.
Your recharge will be done instantly. Feel free to reach out to us if you don't get your talk-time in 24 hours.
Q. I have enough magicpin points but it's still redirecting me to payment page. Why?
To use wallet balance, one successful transaction with bill is mandatory. Complete your first transaction to redeem your wallet points.
Q. I have recharged my phone today but it’s not reflecting yet. Why?
Sometimes, it may take up to several hours for the recharge to reflect. Please let us know if the recharge is not reflected in your wallet in the next 24 hours.
Q. I recharged my phone with Rs. 40 but got only Rs. 24. Why?
While purchasing a prepaid phone recharge voucher worth Rs. 40, you receive a recharge of Rs. 30 which is equal to recharge from any other source. The service charge of Rs. 10 is charged  to manage and sustain wallet services.
Q. I am trying to recharge my phone but it’s showing an error?
You might have selected incorrect mobile operator or entered incorrect mobile number. Also please check that you have a stable internet connection while recharging your phone.
VOUCHER
Q. How to use UBER voucher ?
Follow these steps to use the Uber voucher:
Open the uber app on your device.
On the left top side open the menu and visit the payment section.
Click on "Add promo/gift code" and enter the voucher code.
The voucher will be added and you will be given a discount on your next ride.
Q. How to use PVR voucher?
Follow these steps to use the PVR voucher:
Select your movie, timings, seating arrangements and proceed for payment
Now in payment options, click on PVR Exclusive-Offers
Under this category, click on "Starpass".
Type your voucher code and click on "Apply ". The voucher amount will be deducted from the overall sum.
Q. What happens if the ticket price is less than the voucher amount for PVR voucher?
The voucher value cannot exceed the value of movie ticket. If the price of movie ticket is Rs.125, then the worth of the voucher will be reduced to Rs. 125 as one voucher is applicable for 1 movie ticket only and not as per the total sum.
However, it is beneficial if you are going for bookings higher than the value of voucher. You can do so by just applying Cluster-3 vouchers. For eg. Recliners in Select City Walk cost around Rs. 700 per person but you can book one recliner seat by applying just one Cluster-3 voucher of Rs. 330.
Q. PVR voucher transaction failed?
Please apply the voucher at least after 2 hours if you have applied it anywhere and cancelled the transaction later.
Q. How many vouchers can I use in a bill?
Only 1 voucher can be redeemed on a particular bill/table.
Q. How to apply Freshmenu voucher?
Follow these steps to use the Freshmenu voucher:
Open Freshmenu app from your device and log in from your account.
Add the products you want to order into your cart.
Add the delivery address and click on Checkout.
On payment page, click on "Add a promocode". Enter the voucher code you want to use and click on pay.
OTHERS
Q. How to change privacy settings?
Click on the three dots on the top right corner of a post. From the drop-down menu, click on ‘Edit privacy’ and select the appropriate option.
Click on the right-hand settings in your profile, then scroll down for posts and click on 'Settings' on the right hand side of the pots. Now you can click on 'Edit privacy' and select the appropriate option.
Your Privacy Is Our Priority
Q. How to remove images uploaded over Google?
We would like to inform you that the posts that have been set as public sometimes land up over Google. You can decide on who sees your post by changing the privacy, using the ‘Edit Privacy’ option on the top-right side of any of your posts. You can change your profile picture as well since there is no option to delete the same.
Kindly refer
link
to know more about Levels Of Privacy in magicpin.
Please follow the steps shown in the video to make your posts private:
Create Post Private
Follow these steps to change your profile pic:
Open your magicpin app and click on the account tab.
Visit the profile section.
On the top right side of your profile pic you will find an option to edit.
Please select that option and enter/update the details accordingly.
Further, as per your concern for the deletion of an image appearing over Google kindly follow the steps below :
Edit privacy to “Only me” as explained above.
Copy the link address of the google image that you wish to remove from Google images.(Note : Do not copy image address)
Go to the link below and paste the image URL/ link address in the box next to "Request removal”
Remove Image
Click Request removal.
It may take upto 3 to 4 working days for complete removal of the images after generating the removal request.
Q. How to change my email address?
Open your magicpin app and click on top corner to open the navigation drawer. Click on your profile.
On the top right side of your profile pic you will find an option to ‘edit’.
Please select that option and enter/update the details accordingly.
Q. How to stop email notifications?
You can simply click on the "Unsubscribe" button on the bottom of any of the mail which you have received from us and you will no longer receive email notifications.
Q. How to book deals for higher cashback?
Click on the deals section of magicpin app and search the outlet you want to visit. There, you will get  option to book deal. You can check all booked deals in My transactions> Booked Deals section on the app. Once the deal is booked, the coupon code generated for higher cashback will be applied automatically when you claim a cashback from the outlet.
Q. How to check my purchased vouchers?
Click on the left topmost corner on the homepage of your magicpin app. There you will find several options like Home, redeem points , transactions etc .
Go to My Transactions> Vouchers section and to find the details of vouchers purchased by you.
Referral
Q. I referred someone but referral amount has not been credited yet?
There are a few reasons for this happening. One of these mentioned below should apply to you.
To earn referral reward, the first successful transaction with bill is mandatory. As the number you have mentioned has only installed the app and not made the first successful transaction, no referral reward has been credited yet to you.
The number you have mentioned is already registered with us from an account or the app has already been installed earlier on the device of the referred friend.
The number you have referred has installed the app from a location where magicpin is inactive. Please note that currently we are live in Delhi-NCR , Chandigarh , Bangalore , Jaipur , Panchkula , Mumbai , Shimla , Manali , Ooty , Coorg , Rishikesh , Haridwar , Hyderabad. We are gradually expanding to other part of the country.
The number you have mentioned had not installed the app via your referral. We request you to check again and refer more of your friends to earn more rewards.
Referral reward is not applicable with the number you have shared with us as it is not fulfilling our security criteria. Please share your selfie and bill to avail cashback and refer more of your friends to get referral bonus.
Q. I referred someone and he has already completed the first transaction but referral reward has still not been credited?
To earn referral reward first successful transaction with bill is mandatory. You will not get referral reward if your  friend has got a partial cashback. Please ask your friend to visit any nearby store to avail the complete cashback  to earn referral reward.
Referral T&C
Referral rewards will be given only when the person you referred successfully completed a delivery transaction or redeemed a voucher, or made an offline payment using MagicPay.
Referral rewards will be provided within 48 hours of a successful referral.
Referral rewards will be provided only when the child user has done a transaction on the latest version of the app.
If you purchase vouchers, redeemed, and not refunded then referral award is applicable.
Users who refer others will receive their reward through an app notification within 48 hours of the referred user successfully completing their first transaction.
Referred users must spend Rs. 100 for delivery transactions or Rs. 200 for voucher redemption or MagicPay transactions to receive the referral reward.
Referral rewards will be issued for transactions made in specific cities: GURGAON, NEW DELHI, BANGALORE, PUNE, HYDERABAD, MUMBAI, KOLKATA, CHENNAI, NAVI MUMBAI, NOIDA, GHAZIABAD, JAIPUR, AHMEDABAD, THANE, GREATER NOIDA, LUCKNOW, SECUNDERABAD, FARIDABAD, CHANDIGARH, PATNA, LUDHIANA, INDORE, SURAT, BHUBANESWAR, VIJAYAWADA, VISAKHAPATNAM, UDAIPUR, BHOPAL, JODHPUR, KALYAN, HOWRAH, BHILWARA, KANPUR, NASHIK, NELLORE, GORAKHPUR, AMRITSAR, DHANBAD, KOLHAPUR, VADODARA, MOHALI, KOTA, PANIPAT, JAMSHEDPUR, MYSORE, COIMBATORE, PATIALA, AURANGABAD, MEERUT, DEHRADUN, KARNAL, VARANASI, SOLAPUR, RAIPUR, NAGPUR, BAREILLY, KALIMPONG, RANCHI, PANCHKULA, AMBALA, JALANDHAR, SRI GANGANAGAR, CUTTACK, RAJKOT, MANGALORE, ALLAHABAD, AMRAVATI, BALURGHAT, JAMNAGAR, HARIDWAR, LATUR, JAMMU, ROHTAK.
Referral rewards will not be given for the purchase of online merchant vouchers like Flipkart, Amazon, and on some Other Blacklisted Merchant also etc., by the referred user.
Delivery-based offers are only available when you order from Magicpin's delivery partners and are not applicable for self-pickup or merchant delivery.
The coupon codes received as referral rewards are valid for the next 7 days from the day the reward is issued. Referral coupon codes are specific to each user and cannot be used on any other account.
It may take up to 30 days to receive confirmation of voucher redemption for specific merchants. Referral reward will be given after this confirmation period.
You can receive a referral reward for a maximum of 100 referrals.
A referral reward will not be issued if the person you refer has already signed up using the same device.
Referral points will not be credited if one or more of the following conditions exist
Referral points will not be given if the user's device is rooted.
Referral points will not be given if a user tries to refer a new user on a device that has been used on magicpin before.
Referral points will not be given for mobile recharge transactions.
Referral points will not be given if the system identifies the actions of the referred or referring user as suspicious.
Referral points will not be given if the user installed the app from a locality that is not in the list of active magicpin localities.
Magicpin reserves the right to:
magicpin reserves the right to modify the referral program at any time without prior notice.
magicpin can refuse to provide referral rewards in case of suspicious activity by the referred or referring user.
magicpin may suspend an account if a user is involved in suspicious activity.
Campaign T&C
Campaign Content Terms
The picture & caption should be relevant to the content asked in the campaign. Picture should be of self or clicked by you. Google/Meme images are not allowed.
Your post is subject to removal if it does not follow our content guidelines and thereby not eligible for any reward running on the campaign.
Campaign Voucher Terms
You should get target likes within 3 days from your post creation.
Incase you have not received the coupon code for your facebook likes, last date to claim on customer care is 5 days from your post creation.
To claim reward, incase you haven’t received it, share your facebook post screenshot along with post link to care@magicpin.in after 3 days of post creation.
You can claim reward for facebook once per campaign in 7 days.
Fair Usage Policy
The user will get 1 point per Rewarded* Claim, after 30 Rewarded Claims in a rolling 14 day period
1
.
The user will get 1 point per Rewarded Claim, after 3 Rewarded Claims at the same merchant in a rolling 7 day period
2
.
The user will get a maximum of 50 points per transaction, after getting 3000 cashback points in a rolling 30 day period
3
. The policy would be applicable to magicpay transactions, AR transactions with bill and selfie claim transactions (including transactions with coupon code and booked deal).
magicpin may suspend or discontinue your access/use of your magicpin account/wallet if there is any violation of fair usage policy or it suspects that  transactions are being done fraudulently.
The user will get a maximum of 10 cashback points per successful Group Buy after s/he has crossed a limit of 1000 Group Buy cashback points in a single day.
The user can only be part of 5 active or completed groups per day.
magicpin may suspend or discontinue your access/use of your magicpin account/wallet if there is any kind of association with a fraudulent user/ group of users.
User can redeem maximum of 10,000 magicpin points from the wallet in rolling 30 day period. Quest reward vouchers will also be accounted for the 10,000 points usage limitation. After the limit is exhausted, user can buy only by adding balance through other wallets (Paytm, Phonepe, Debit/ Credit Cards) until the limit is restored.
*Rewarded Claim here means any claim in which a user gets full cashback or partial cashback.
1. A 14 day rolling window for the transaction created on 1 Dec at 16:00 hour would end on 15th Dec at 16:00 hour (336 hours after the transaction is created).
[
Link
]
2. A 7 day rolling window for the transaction created on 1 Dec at 16:00 hour would end on 8th Dec at 16:00 hour (168 hours after the transaction is created).
[
Link
]
3. A 30 day rolling window for the transaction created on 1 Dec at 16:00 hour would end on 31th Dec at 16:00 hour (720 hours after the transaction is created).
[
Link
]
4. In the Electronics category, users shall be rewarded a maximum of 4 times in a period of rolling 30-days.
New User Offer
Applicable only on 1st order
Applicable only if 1st order is a home delivery
How to reedem
Click on the item you wish to order
Coupon code is auto applied
Click on Pay button
Pay the order amount
Terms & Conditions -
Coupon code is applicable only on select outlets
Coupon code is applicable only in select cities
Applicable only if 1st order is a home delivery
Not applicable if user has already completed a redemption transaction (Magicpay transaction or Voucher purchase or Recharge transaction)
Applicable only on 1 sim per device
SIM must be in device in which code is applied
Free Delivery is only available over the restaurant’s minimum order value
Multiple coupon codes/offers cannot be applied together
Government taxes and service charges as applicable
Pay By magicpin T&Cs -
Pay by magicpin will be counted as a successful claim transaction. Hence, it will be counted towards Fair usage policy restrictions.
A user can claim only one cashback per merchant per day. Selfie+bill and pay by magicpin both are forms of cashback claim and a user can do only one of them.
Cashback will be provided only on the amount that is paid to the merchant through 'Pay by magicpin'. External direct payments to
			merchant will not be considered for providing cashback.
The bill size that can be paid in a day using Pay by magicpin cannot exceed INR 10,000.
Pay by magicpin feature is currently available on a selected number of merchants/outlets
A user is allowed to pay via magicpay max. of 2 times a day at a merchant.
Prepaid
Postpaid
Terms & Conditions:
Just enter your prepaid phone number and get the recharge.
Discount on phone recharge is available only for the user's registered contact no. Users can recharge other phone no. from the platform but magicpin points usage will not be allowed on the same.
Disclaimer : While we support most recharges, we request you to verify with your operator once before proceeding.
We are currently restocking Airtel and Jio Prepaid recharges. Will be back by end of this week.
Maximum of 1 transaction for Prepaid per user per month across all the cities.
Just enter your postpaid phone number and bill would be paid.
Maximum of 1 transaction for Postpaid per user per month across all the cities.
You cannot make advance payment for your postpaid bills.
Discount on phone recharge is available only for the user's registered contact no. Users can recharge other phone no. from the platform but magicpin points usage will not be allowed on the same.
Ola Money
ZestMoney
Amazon Pay
Mobikwik
Starbucks
FreeCharge
MGPUPI
AU BANK
Simpl
Twid
CRED
Sodexo
EMI
Ola Money T&Cs
Postpaid+ : Upto 300 (min 30) cashback on transactions above Rs. 199
Offer is valid once per user per month during the offer period on Magicpin using Ola Money Postpaid+
Offer is valid from: 1st Oct'22 to 31st Oct'22
Offer is valid for OlaMoney Postpaid+ active users only.
Min transaction value: 200
Offer is not applicable for postpaid plus users who have not cleared dues beyond their due dates.
Offer is exclusive to you and intended for your use only.
Cashback will be credited within 10 working days to your active OlaMoney Postpaid+ or Wallet account.
Cashback will not be applicable on EMI transaction on OlaMoney Postpaid+
Mobikwik T&Cs
Wallet:
Get upto 200(assured 20) cashback on min transaction of Rs. 500.
Get up to Rs.200 cashback on magicpin wallet using MobiKwik wallet!
Minimum assured cashback is Rs.20 per transaction
The minimum value to avail the cashback is Rs.500
Offer valid once per user during offer period
Offer valid from 1st - 31st October'22
Cashback shall be credited within 24 Hours of transaction
If the order is canceled or left undelivered at magicpin's end, magicpin (not MobiKwik) will initiate a refund.
After the refund is initiated, the amount will be credited back to the wallet within 7-10 days
In case of partial refunds/cancellations, the refund amount will be adjusted with the Cashback received on the initial payment
Full Cashback will be rolled back in case of a full refund
ZestMoney T&Cs
Flat 20% cashback upto Rs. 75, on a minimum transaction amount of Rs. 149, through ZestMoney on Magicpin
Offer is valid on ZestMoney transactions only on Magicpin website, mobile website and app
Offer can be availed only if the payment is made during the offer period/duration.
Offer valid from 00:00 hrs 22nd June 2022 to 11:59 hrs 22nd July 2022
Offer applicable once per user during the offer period
No coupon code is required at checkout to avail of the offer
Cashback will be processed 15 days post final payment due date, provided all re-payments have been made within the due date period
Cashback will be processed to the user's registered bank account with ZestMoney
In case of refund or cancellation of the order placed, the transaction will not be eligible for the cashback offer
Please reach out to
help@zestmoney.com
for any offer-related queries
Amazon Pay Later: Enjoy limit up to Rs. 60,000 with Amazon Pay Later
Eligibility:
Now enjoy a higher credit limit with Amazon Pay Later on your transactions.
Users first need to activate Amazon Pay Later on Amazon App
Once Amazon Pay Later is activated, Users can link Amazon Account on magicpin
Users can utilize Amazon Pay Later limit on magicpin for all transactions
Amazon Pay, Amazon Shopping Vouchers, Myntra and Flipkart are not allowed to be purchased with Amazon Pay Later or Amazon Pay Balance
Amazon Pay Later account needs to have sufficient limit to complete the transaction
Amazon Pay: Assured Rs. 25 cashback on Amazon Pay Balance/wallet
Rewards
Cash back of up to Rs. 250 on orders above 299 on magicpin
15 Rs. assured cashback on 1st transaction
Rs. 10 assured cashback on 2nd transaction
Minimum order of 299 required to avail the offer
Cashback will be credited to your Amazon Pay balance account within 24 hours of transaction
In case of refunded transactions, cashback may be deducted from the balance amount
Hot to avail?
Users need to  link Amazon Account on magicpin
User can utilize Amazon Pay balance  on magicpin for all transactions
Amazon Pay, Amazon Shopping Vouchers, Myntra and Flipkart are not allowed to be purchased with Amazon Pay Later or Amazon Pay Balance
Amazon Pay balance  needs to have sufficient limit to complete the transaction
Offer can be availed twice during the offer period
Offer Duration
22nd Aug ~ 30th Sep, 2023
PayPal T&Cs
About the PayPal Cashback offer
Start Time: 30th March 2020.
End Time: 30th April 2020.
Eligibility: New user's first ever PayPal transaction.
Cashback voucher: 50% cashback upto Rs. 100
Max Cashback voucher amount: 100
Min transaction amount to be eligible for cashback voucher (after discount): 200
Cashback voucher award timeline: 7 DAY DELAY
Cashback voucher redemption period: INSTANT
Cashback voucher expiry: 60 days from award of cashback voucher
Pay with PayPal on above merchant to be eligible for the cashback voucher offer.
The cashback voucher will be in the form a discount. Please see the terms and conditions below for more details.
HOW TO AVAIL THE OFFER
Create your account with PayPal on
www.paypal.in
or login using your existing PayPal account.
Visit the website/app of the above merchant.
Proceed to the payments page and select PayPal as your payment option.
Sign-in into your PayPal account and pay with your saved card (add card if not already added).
If you are eligible for cashback, the same will be added in your PayPal account.
You will recieve an email notifying you about the cashback in your PayPal account.
TERMS AND CONDITIONS
Offer: 50% cashback upto Rs. 100 for New users of PayPal after their 1st transaction at magicpin app and website. All cards accepted.
Offer valid on minimum transaction value (after discount) of Rs. 200.
Offer period: Valid from 30th Mar to 30th April 2020.
Offer can be availed only once per new user of PayPal on their 1st transaction
The cashback will be in the form of a discount cash voucher which can be redeemed for your next PayPal transaction.
You will receive an email notifying you about the cashback in your PayPal account. The cashback voucher award timeline is 7 days and voucher can be redeemed instantly.
The cashback voucher will be valid for 60 days from the date of receipt of the email containing voucher details. Please check email for actual expiry date of cashback.
To avail this offer, create your new account with PayPal on www.paypal.in or login using your existing PayPal account. Visit magicpin app, website or m-web, after choosing your vouchers proceed to the Payments page and select PayPal as your payment option, to pay with your saved card (add card if not already added.)
Offer valid for PayPal India account holders
If you are eligible for cashback, the same will be added in your PayPal account. Check your cashback voucher amount on http://www.paypal.com/myaccount/wallet
This offer cannot be combined with any offer/voucher/discount on merchant.
PayPal reserves the right to employ reasonable technological and other methods to prevent abuse of the Offer terms. Further, you acknowledge that PayPal’s decision to take certain actions, including limiting access to your offer, placing holds or imposing reserves, may be based on confidential criteria that is essential to our management of risk, the security of users’ accounts, comply with applicable laws and the otherwise protect the PayPal system. You agree that PayPal is under no obligation to disclose the details of its risk management or its security procedures to you. Transactions processed through Virtual Cards will not be eligible for this cashback voucher. If your order is cancelled by the payer / refunded by the merchant, PayPal cashback voucher that has been awarded to your PayPal account will be withdrawn. In case of cancellations/ refunds where awarded cashback voucher is used, 100% cashback voucher will be refunded if the offer period is still valid. For partial cancellations, refund will be processed as per PayPal policies. In cases of fraudulent/suspicious transactions, PayPal solely reserves the right to revoke the cashback voucher offer / not award the cashback voucher at all.
Starbucks T&Cs
The Starbucks eGift Card does not have an expiry date.
The Starbucks eGift Card can be redeemed via the Starbucks® India mobile app across all Starbucks stores in India.
Please follow these steps to redeem the Gift Card in the Starbucks India mobile app:
Download the Starbucks® India mobile app from App Storeor Play Store
Register for a new My Starbucks Rewards™ account or Sign-in with your exisng details of My Starbucks Rewards™ account.
On the ‘Add a Card’ screen, enter your 14 digit Starbucks gift card number (no spaces) followed by 4 digit CSV code (no spaces).
Your Starbucks eGift Card is ready for use, Tap on ‘Pay’ secon and scan the barcode on the mobile app at any Starbucks store to redeem your eGift card.
Eligibility Criteria: To be eligible for the Starbucks Card membership, you should be competent to enter into a contract i.e. you should have aained the age of majority according to the Indian law. Starbucks Card is not targeted towards, nor intended for use by anyone who has not aained the age of majority. Any person under the age of 18, may only use the Starbucks Card under the supervision of a parent or legal guardian who agrees to be bound by these Terms and Condions.
Starbucks India eGift card/s bought at Amazon.in cannot be returned/refunded
Starbucks card redeemable across all stores in India only.
By using your Starbucks eGift Card, you agree to the below menoned Terms and
                Condions. Please ensure that you have read carefully and understood these Terms and
                Condions before using your Starbucks Card and also request you to keep a copy of these
                Terms and Condions for your records. You further agree that by using the Starbucks Card or
                by quong the Starbucks Card number to any of the TSPL’s store/s located in India, you
                confirm that you have read, understood and accepted the detailed Terms and Condions of
                the Starbucks Card.
The mentioned Terms and Condions are valid for anything related to Starbucks Card only,
                for points outside of Starbucks Card please refer to platform Terms and Condions.
Re-sale of Starbucks Cards purchased from any third party platform is strictly prohibited
The Starbucks eGift Card can be reloaded with addional funds through the Starbucks®
                India mobile app. Once purchased, the Starbucks eGift Card cannot be cancelled by the
                purchaser, nor is the Starbucks eGift Card refundable, returnable or redeemable for cash or
                credit, except where required by law. Any cancellaons shall be at the sole discreon of
                Starbucks India. You cannot purchase other Starbucks eGift Card/s with the Starbucks eGift
                Card/s, nor can you use the Starbucks eGift Card/s to make a payment on a credit account.
                The Starbucks eGift Card/s balance cannot be transferred to any other format of instrument
                expect for another Starbucks Card in the same My Starbucks Rewards™ account.
You are solely responsible for the safety and security of the Gi Card. Issuer / Starbucks
                India is not responsible for any acts of omission or commission if Starbucks eGift Card is lost,
                stolen or used without permission. Once the Starbucks eGift Card has been sent to you, you
                are bound to protect the Starbucks eGift Card 14 digit number and the 4 digit CSV code as
                confidenal.
                IN THE EVENT THAT A GIFT CARD IS NON-FUNCTIONAL, YOUR SOLE REMEDY (AND
                STARBUCKS INDIA’S SOLE POTENTIAL LIABILITY) SHALL BE THE REPLACEMENT OF SUCH GIFT
                CARD.
Purchases made with value from the Starbucks eGift Card are not refundable, except where
                required by law.
                Issuer assumes no responsibility for the products purchased using the Gi Cards and any liability
                thereof is expressly disclaimed. For quesons pertaining to redempon and value for Starbucks
                Card/s, please contact Tata Starbucks Customer Care at 18602660010 (9am to 9pm) or at
                customercare@tatastarbucks.com. For quesons pertaining to purchase of Starbucks Card/s please
                contact (vendor name) at (contact no.) or at (email id)
If any term of this Agreement is deemed to be invalid, void or for any reason
                unenforceable, such term shall be deemed severable and will not affect the validity and
                enforceability of any remaining terms of this Agreement. For customer service, please
                contact Tata Starbucks Customer Care at 18602660010 (9am to 9pm) or at
customercare@tatastarbucks.com.
Changes to these Terms and Condions
                Starbucks India reserves the right to add, alter, amend and revise terms and condions as
                well as the rules and regulaons governing the eGift Card without prior noce, and without
                assigning any reasons thereof. In the event of such changes, the latest terms & condions
                will be updated and viewed on our website
www.starbucks.in.
Cancellaon of these Terms and Condions
                Starbucks India may suspend or terminate these terms and condions and revoke or limit
                any or all of the rights and privileges granted to you at any me without noce or liability.
                Terminaon may also result from your fraudulent or unauthorized use of the eGift Card.
Governing Law:
                All disputes, in connecon with eGift Card or its program shall be governed and construed in
                accordance with Indian Laws and are subject to the exclusive jurisdicon of Competent
                Courts at Mumbai only.
Trademark Information
                The “Starbucks,” “Starbucks Coffee” and Siren Logo trademarks are owned by Starbucks
                Corporaon and used by the Company under a license. The “TATA” mark and logo are owned
                by Tata Sons Limited and are used by the Company under a license from Tata Sons Limited.
All other trademarks, service marks, domain names, logos, company names and indicia of
            origin referred to on the Sites are either trademarks, service marks, domain names, logos,
            company names or indicia of origin or are otherwise the property of the Company or its
            affiliates or licensors. Other product or company names referred to on the Sites may be
            trademarks of their respecve owners. You may not use any trademark, service mark,
            domain name, logo, company name, trade name or indicia of origin of the Company,
            Starbucks Corporaon, Tata Sons Limited or any third party without permission from the
            owner of the applicable trademark, service mark, domain name, logo, company name, trade
            name or indicia of origin. You may contact the Company by sending an e-mail to Customer
            Care or wring to Tata Starbucks Private Limited, Customer Care, 4th Floor, New Excelsior
            Building, Amrit Keshav Nayak Marg, Fort, Mumbai – 400 001 to request wrien permission
            to use trademarks, indicia of origin and materials on the Sites for purposes other than stated
            in these Terms of Use or for all other quesons relang to the Sites.
Freecharge UPI: Up to Rs. 20 cashback on minimum order of Rs. 499
Offer Eligibility:
Applicable on 1st UPI transaction on Freecharge UPI
Minimum order value of Rs. 499 is required
Offer is valid once per user during the offer period
Offer Duration:
1st Sep ~ 30th Sep, 2023
Rewards
Assured cashback of Rs. 10 on minimum order value of Rs. 499
Cashback will only be credited when the amount is paid using Freecharge UPI
Cashback will be credited in the form of Freecharge Gift instrument within 72 hours from the date of transaction
Offer:
Get flat 10% off upto Rs. 200 using AU Bank Credit/Debit Cards. Min order: Rs. 500.
Use Code:
AUCC10
for Credit Cards and
AUDC10
for Debit Cards.
TnCs:
Offer: Get 10% off upto Rs. 200 on a minimum purchase of Rs. 500
Max discount allowed is Rs. 200
Minimum order value should be equal to or greater than Rs. 500
This offer is only valid for AU Bank Credit/Debit Card holders.
The duration of this offer is from 4 Oct 2022 to 31 Oct 2022.
Offer is valid once per user per card during the campaign duration
The offer cannot be clubbed with any other offer.
Offer is not valid on branded vouchers.
magicpin reserves the right to disqualify discounts at their discretion pertaining to abuse/fraud.
Code not applicable on: Air Asia, Ajio, Amazon, Amazon Prime, Big Bazaar, Big Bazaar : magicpin, Bigbasket, Bluestone : Sector 29, Bluestone.com, Brand Factory, Candere Diamond jewllery, Central, Croma, Croma :, Croma Online, Decathlon, Estele Jewelry, Euphoria Jewellery, Fashion At Big Bazaar, Flipkart, Giva, Godrej Nature's Basket, Grofers : PAN India, Home Centre, Joyalukkas, Kalyan Jewellers, Ketan Diamonds, Khosla Electronics, Lifestyle, Lulu Hypermarket, Malabar, Malabar : Sector 29, Max Fashion, More Supermarket, Movie Card India, Myntra, Ornaz, Pantaloons, Patra Electronics, Pc Jeweller, Pepperfry, Ratandeep Super Market, Ray-Ban, Reliance Digital : Sector 29, Reliance Jewels : Sector 29, Reliance Smart, Shoppers Stop, Spencer's, Sri Jagdamba Jewellers, Surat Daimond : Girgaon, Surat Diamond Jewellery, Taj Hotels, Taneria, Tanishq, Tata CLiQ, V Mart, Vijay Sales, Vmart, Westside
MGPUPI T&Cs
Offer: Extra 1% off for UPI payments on selected merchants
Offer is valid on every transaction on these
merchants
Offer valid upon using UPI as the payment method
Apply code MGPUPI while checkout to avail the offer
Offer is valid starting from "1st July 2021"
Offer is exclusive to you and intended for your use only
Selling these vouchers to third party is against fair usage policy and is considered fraud
SIMPL: Flat Rs. 30 cashback on minimum order of Rs. 349
Offer Eligibility:
Applicable to every user
Offer can be availed once during the offer period
Offer Duration:
25th Aug ~ 15th Sep, 2023
Rewards
Flat Rs. 30 cashback on any transaction done during the mentioned period
Minimum order of 349 Rs. to avail the cashback
Cashback will be credited to your Simpl account on or by 6th September, 2023
In case of refunds, the cashback will be adjusted against the refund amount
TWID: Instant discount and additional cashback up to Rs. 150*
Offer Eligibilit:
Flat 5% up to Rs. 150 cashback on purchase of Gift cards on magicpin
Flat 10% up to Rs. 100 cashback on non gift card transactions on magicpin
Applicable only when you pay through TWID - Pay with Rewards on magicpin
Offer can be availed twice during the campaign validity
Offer Duration:
1st Sep ~ 30th Sep, 2023
Rewards:
Cashback will be issued within 30 days of completion of eligible transaction
Twid and Magicpin reserves the right to withdraw, modify or replace this offer with another offer at any time without prior notice and the same is at the sole discretion of the company.
This offer cannot be combined with any other payment offer.
This Offer is conducted by Twidpay.
By availing this offer, it is deemed that the customer has agreed to all the terms & conditions mentioned herein.
CRED Pay: Up to ₹250 cashback on UPI
Terms and Conditions:
Offer is applicable on 1st UPI transaction on CRED Pay
No minimum order value is required
Offer duration:
13th July ~ 31st July, 2023
How to claim cashback:
Users need to claim their cashback within 7 days from the CRED app
Other T&C may apply as per CRED's discretion
Sodexo Meal Passes: Now order food with your Sodexo Meal Pass balance
How to enjoy savings on Sodexo Meal Pass:
Are now enabled for food ordering on magicpin
No minimum order value is required
Users can pay via their Sodexo Meal Pass balance on payment gateway
You can add new Sodexo Meal Pass card on Payment Gateway while placing the order
If your balance is enough, you can pay instantly via Sodexo Meal Pass
EMI
How does EMI work?
EMI stands for Equated Monthly Instalment. It is a convenient option that allows you to purchase a
					product immediately, but its price can be paid over a period of time. The instalment is calculated on a
					certain percentage of the product price. All you need to do is pay that fixed amount every month. This
					helps you get any product you choose without thinking twice about its price.
How to avail EMI?
Availing EMI at magicpin won't take much time as it requires only a few steps. All you need to do is:
Add vouchers to the cart / enter your bill amount
On the cart page, check the various EMI plans available for the product
On the payment page, choose EMI as the mode of payment
Fill in the required details and proceed further
EMI is available on all major debit and credit cards for a tenure ranging from 3 months to 36 months
Select your debit or credit card and proceed for EMI payment
What are the benefits of EMI at Magicpin?
You can not only buy gift card / pay your bill on EMI but also can enjoy running discounts and offers on the stores without putting pressure on your pocket.
How does Debit EMI work?
Debit EMI is a new EMI method. The bank won't block your card and you don't need the full amount in your account to transact. Your bank will deduct the monthly EMI from your account using the pre-approved overdraft facility. Currently only a few banks offer this facility
What is the minimum transaction value to avail EMI?
To avail EMI, you need to make a minimum purchase of ₹5000.
Is there any interest on EMI?
For EMI purchases using credit & debit card, your bank will charge you interest. The total payable amount (including interest) will be mentioned upfront when choosing the tenure of EMI.
Why has my EMI not been processed?
Banks process EMIs within 2-4 days. It will initially deduct the whole money from your credit/debit card and convert the amount (expect down payment) into EMI within 2-4 days.
For revised payments, confirm EMI option and tenure selected. Find details under Your Orders>View Order Details>Payment Information.
How can I close my EMI earlier?
For EMI purchases using credit/debit card purchases: Contact your bank to close your EMI early, subject to foreclosure fees as per their policy.
What will happen to EMI if I cancel the order?
If you cancel or return an EMI order purchased using credit cards / debit cards, Magicpin will refund the full purchase amount to your original payment method and cancel the EMI . Any down payment will be refunded within 5-7 business days. You will then need to contact your bank to confirm the cancellation. For credit cards: Your card issuing bank may charge nominal pre-closure charges in case you've already paid an EMI. For more details on EMI closure, please contact the card issuing bank.
Will I have to pay any extra amount for EMI transaction?
For EMI using credit or debit card, you will be charged a processing fee* by the bank (billed with your first EMI.) The processing fee details for some of the banks are -
How can I close my EMI earlier?
For EMI purchases using credit/debit card purchases: Contact your bank to close your EMI early, subject to foreclosure fees as per their policy.
Terms and Conditions of Credit Card No Cost EMI
The following terms and conditions apply to equated monthly installment ("EMI") transactions made using an eligible credit card issued by any bank and using EMI facility as a payment option
The EMI facility is being offered to the customers who make a purchase transaction on magicpin mobile application using an eligible credit card issued by any bank using EMI facility; if listed on Magicpin
The EMI facility is offered by participating banks and is made available on select brands/stores. This list can be updated time to time as per discretion of Magicpin
The EMI payment option can be availed using the credit card of listed bank on Magicpin and is not available on purchases made using net banking or pay on delivery payment methods.
The banks issuing the credit cards reserve the right to charge Goods and Services Tax (GST) or other applicable taxes on the purchase transactions undertaken on EMI which will be over and above the product price.
Customers can add more than one item to their cart and if all the products are eligible for EMI, such customer will receive EMI payment option on payment page.
Following are the charges & processing fees(Can change time to time, bank to bank):
ICICI Debit Card is ₹99 + GST
ICICI Credit Card is ₹199 + GST
SBI credit card is ₹99 + GST
HDFC credit / debit card is ₹199 + GST
Bajaj Finserv EMI network card is ₹149 + GST
Kotak Debit card - ₹199 + GST
The EMI facility is made available to the customers by and in the sole discretion of the banks issuing the credit cards. Magicpin will not be liable for any claims on account of availability or non-availability of EMI facility.
Magicpin reserves the right to stop EMI payment option at any time without prior notice and without any liability
The EMI facility is being offered by the respective banks to the customer and Magicpin has no role to play in the approval, extension, pricing, modification, pre-closure, closure or any matter incidental thereto pertaining to offering of the EMI facility, which is decided at the sole discretion of the bank.
The EMI facility being offered by the banks to the customers is governed by the respective terms and conditions of each bank/issuer and the customer is advised to approach the bank/issuer in case of any complaint, dispute or enquiry about an EMI transaction.
EMI option will be available on minimum transaction of 5000 Rs. and this limit can be revised any time as per company decision. EMI option will not be available on food, grocery and pharmacy delivery.
Statutory taxes (GST, Education cess and any other taxes) will be levied by the banks on the charges levied by them for the EMI facility as mandated by applicable laws and regulations.
Magicpin reserves the right to stop facilitating this service without any prior notice.
Magicpin on a best effort basis displays representative EMI related information (EMI amount, Interest rate charged, Total amount payable) for the customers as per the information shared with it by the respective banks on an "AS IS" basis. Banks/issuers are the authoritative source of this information and customers are advised to directly contact their bank/issuer for any further clarifications in this regard. For more information, we request you to review the terms and conditions of the respective banks offering such EMI facility.
Magicpin may charge the customer any processing or convenience fee for the purpose of facilitating the EMI facility for its customers.
In the case of customer cancellations or return of items purchased on EMI, Magicpin will facilitate the refunds. The customer is advised to check with the respective bank/issuer offering the EMI how the cancellations or refund will affect the EMI terms and of any pre-closure or interest charges levied on the customer.
Magicpin shall not be held liable for any dispute arising out of or in connection with such EMI facility being offered by the respective banks/issuer including but not limited to the authenticity and/or accuracy of any EMI information supplied by the banks to Magicpin for displaying